Illinois, session 104th, SB3759.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)7    Sec. 10-20.88. Staff showering or bathing policy. 8    (a) A school board shall create a policy that prohibits 9all school personnel from using a showering or bathing 10facility accessible to a student during school hours.11    The policy shall clearly state that school personnel are 12responsible for ensuring no student is in or near the 13showering or bathing facility before using the facility for 14showering or bathing. The policy shall state that if a student 15enters the showering or bathing facility, then school 16personnel shall immediately direct the student to the exit of 17the facility and inform the school administrator of the 18incident.19    (b) During an activity involving physical exertion, 20including, but not limited to, athletic coaching or physical 21education class, all school personnel shall maintain 22professional conduct and dress at all times. A showering or 23bathing facility that is for student use may not be used by any   SB3759- 2 -LRB104 19172 LNS 32617 b1school personnel while students are in the vicinity or during 2the school day. School personnel shall uphold the school 3district's broader policies on the supervision of students, 4safety, and professional ethics. 5    (c) School personnel that violate the policy may be 6subject to corrective action, including, but not limited to, 7counseling, retraining, or other administrative measures. 8    (d) The school board shall review the policy annually and 9update the policy as needed to comply with any changes to the 10law, best practices, or feedback from school personnel.  11    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)12    Sec. 34-18.88. Staff showering or bathing policy. 13    (a) The board shall create a policy that prohibits all 14school personnel from using a showering or bathing facility 15accessible to a student during school hours. 16    The policy shall clearly state that school personnel are 17responsible for ensuring no student is in or near the 18showering or bathing facility before using the facility for 19showering or bathing. The policy shall state that if a student 20enters the showering or bathing facility, then school 21personnel shall immediately direct the student to the exit of 22the facility and inform the school administrator of the 23incident.24    (b) During an activity involving physical exertion, 25including, but not limited to, athletic coaching or physical   SB3759- 3 -LRB104 19172 LNS 32617 b1education class, all school personnel shall maintain 2professional conduct and dress at all times. A showering or 3bathing area that is for student use may not be used by any 4school personnel while students are in the vicinity or during 5the school day. School personnel shall uphold the school 6district's broader policies on the supervision of students, 7safety, and professional ethics. 8    (c) School personnel that violate the policy may be 9subject to corrective action, including, but not limited to, 10counseling, retraining, or other administrative measures. 11    (d) The board shall review the policy annually and update 12the policy as needed to comply with any changes to the law, 13best practices, or feedback from school personnel.